Wisconsin, session 2025, AB416.
do enact as follows:AB416,11Section 1. 31.385 (2) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB416,2,5231.385 (2) (d) The financial assistance that is provided under this section 3shall be paid from the appropriations under ss. 20.370 (4) (ja) and 20.866 (2) (tL) 4and (tx), except as provided in par. pars. (dm) and (dr) and in 1991 Wisconsin Act 539, section 9142 (10d).AB416,26Section 2. 31.385 (2) (dr) of the statutes is created to read:AB416,2,8731.385 (2) (dr) Financial assistance that is provided under sub. (8) shall be 8paid from the appropriation under s. 20.370 (4) (jq).AB416,39Section 3. 31.385 (8) of the statutes is created to read:AB416,2,161031.385 (8) (a) Notwithstanding the limitations under sub. (2) (a) and the 11funding allocation requirements under sub. (2) (ag) and (ar), the department shall 12provide financial assistance in the form of a onetime payment of $42,000,000 to 13Domtar Paper Company, LLC, for modernization of a dam on the Wisconsin River 14associated with the company’s mill in the village of Rothschild. The department 15may not require Domtar Paper Company, LLC, to provide documentation of actual 16expenses prior to making the payment under this paragraph.AB416,3,31(b) If the dam modernization project under this subsection is not commenced 2by December 31, 2026, Domtar Paper Company, LLC, shall pay to the department, 3in a manner prescribed by the department, the full amount provided under par. (a).AB416,3,84(c) If Domtar Paper Company, LLC, sells either its mill in the village of 5Rothschild or its mill in the city of Nekoosa prior to the completion of the dam 6modernization project under this subsection, Domtar Paper Company, LLC, shall 7pay to the department, in a manner prescribed by the department, any unexpended 8amount of the assistance provided under par. (a).AB416,3,159(d) If the total amount of financial assistance for the dam modernization 10project under this subsection that Domtar Paper Company, LLC, receives from all 11sources exceeds two-thirds of the cost of the project, Domtar Paper Company, LLC, 12shall pay to the department, in a manner prescribed by the department, an amount 13that is equal to the difference between two-thirds of the cost of the project and the 14total amount of financial assistance received by Domtar Paper Company, LLC, for 15the project.AB416,3,2316(e) Domtar Paper Company, LLC, shall agree in writing to invest 17$100,000,000 in north central Wisconsin via its manufacturing facilities in the 18village of Rothschild and the city of Nekoosa by the first day of the month beginning 193 years after the effective date of this paragraph. If Domtar Paper Company, LLC, 20does not make that amount in financial investments in north central Wisconsin by 21the date specified in this paragraph, Domtar Paper Company, LLC, shall pay to the 22department, in a manner prescribed by the department, the full amount provided 23under par. (a).AB416,4,1124(f) For the duration of the dam modernization project under this subsection, 1Domtar Paper Company, LLC, shall agree to use roundwood and wood chips only 2from Wisconsin producers to produce products at any facility owned or operated by 3Domtar Paper Company, LLC, in the village of Rothschild. If Domtar Paper 4Company, LLC, produces products at any facility owned or operated by Domtar 5Paper Company, LLC, in the village of Rothschild using roundwood or wood chips 6from non-Wisconsin producers during the duration of the dam modernization 7project under this subsection, Domtar Paper Company, LLC, shall pay to the 8department, in a manner prescribed by the department, the full amount provided 9under par. (a). This paragraph does not apply if extenuating circumstances prevent 10Domtar Paper Company, LLC, from using roundwood and wood chips only from 11Wisconsin producers.AB416,4,1212